Utah statutes.
58-60-303.   Board -- Powers.

(1)  There is created the Marriage and Family Therapist Licensing Board consisting of four marriage and family therapists and one member from the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed, serve terms, and be compensated in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The board shall:

(a)  comply with the provisions of Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203;

(b)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist the division in review of complaints concerning unlawful or unprofessional practice by a licensee in the respective profession regulated by the board, and to advise the division with respect to the conduct of investigations of the complaints; and

(c)  disqualify any member from acting as presiding officer in any administrative procedure in which that member has previously reviewed the complaint or advised the division.



Amended by Chapter 159, 2000 General Session

